District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.02

Board of Dietetics and Nutrition.

(a)

There is established a Board of Dietetics and Nutrition to consist of 3 members appointed by the Mayor.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practice of dietetics and nutrition.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 1 shall be a licensed dietitian, 1 shall be a licensed nutritionist who is not a dietitian, and 1 shall be a consumer member.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 1 shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 1 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 1 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 202, 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., § 2-3302.2.
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.